New York, session 2025-2026, S6112.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general municipal law is amended by adding a new 2 section 209-vv to read as follows: 3 § 209-vv. Contracts between municipalities and police districts for 4 school safety in a city with a population of more than one million; 5 void. Notwithstanding any general, local or special law or charter 6 provision, the board of education or trustees of a school district in a 7 city with a population of more than one million shall not designate, 8 authorize, appoint or enter into an agreement with any city, town, 9 village or police department, police district, sheriff's department or 10 the division of state police for the purpose of providing sworn officers 11 as school safety officers, security officers or resource officers in the 12 schools of such school district, or the property thereof, in order to 13 protect the property or persons on such premises. Any such designation, 14 authorization, appointment or agreement is hereby declared void as 15 contrary to public policy. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10581-01-5